incubator/apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <pardef n="rokokkomøb/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elet</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lane</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lar</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>let</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rettsøst/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>era</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eri</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rene</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rer</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pass__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pat/é__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eane</l>
          <r>é<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>é<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>een</l>
          <r>é<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>é</l>
          <r>é<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="skr/å__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åa</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åa</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åene</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærne</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åer</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ær</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ået</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åi</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åi</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Rødehavet__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="øs/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="skrumut/ter__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rane</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rar</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>terane</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>terar</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>teren</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ter</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Skedsmokorset"><i>Skedsmokorset</i><par n="Rødehavet__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Norskehavet"><i>Norskehavet</i><par n="Rødehavet__np"/></e>
    <e lm="øyde"><i>øyd</i><par n="øs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ordenssyster"><i>ordenssyst</i><par n="rettsøst/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sigle"><i>sigl</i><par n="øs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="røykekupé"><i>røykekup</i><par n="pat/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pass"><i>pass</i><par n="pass__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skarabé"><i>skarab</i><par n="pat/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="protesjé"><i>protesj</i><par n="pat/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skrumpnyre"><i>skrumpnyr</i><par n="øs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="protokollkomité"><i>protokollkomit</i><par n="pat/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pygmé"><i>pygm</i><par n="pat/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sameige"><i>sameig</i><par n="øs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Senterpartiet"><i>Senterpartiet</i><par n="Rødehavet__np"/></e>
    <e lm="pyoré"><i>pyor</i><par n="pat/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pappmaché"><i>pappmach</i><par n="pat/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sentralkomité"><i>sentralkomit</i><par n="pat/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Sargassohavet"><i>Sargassohavet</i><par n="Rødehavet__np"/></e>
    <e lm="sauté"><i>saut</i><par n="pat/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="særeige"><i>særeig</i><par n="øs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pappmasjé"><i>pappmasj</i><par n="pat/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sende"><i>send</i><par n="øs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="orkidé"><i>orkid</i><par n="pat/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oppkome"><i>oppkom</i><par n="øs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paté"><i>pat</i><par n="pat/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oljehyre"><i>oljehyr</i><par n="øs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Sahelbeltet"><i>Sahelbeltet</i><par n="Rødehavet__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Riksteatret"><i>Riksteatret</i><par n="Rødehavet__np"/></e>
    <e lm="plissé"><i>pliss</i><par n="pat/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="øksekomité"><i>øksekomit</i><par n="pat/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sjukesyster"><i>sjukesyst</i><par n="rettsøst/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sanitetssyster"><i>sanitetssyst</i><par n="rettsøst/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seksjonsmøbel"><i>seksjonsmøb</i><par n="rokokkomøb/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rettsyster"><i>rettsyst</i><par n="rettsøst/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Rødehavet"><i>Rødehavet</i><par n="Rødehavet__np"/></e>
    <e lm="skrumutter"><i>skrumut</i><par n="skrumut/ter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sjeté"><i>sjet</i><par n="pat/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Saltfjellet"><i>Saltfjellet</i><par n="Rødehavet__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Radiumhospitalet"><i>Radiumhospitalet</i><par n="Rødehavet__np"/></e>
    <e lm="skospenne"><i>skospenn</i><par n="øs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nykke"><i>nykk</i><par n="øs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Skattedirektoratet"><i>Skattedirektoratet</i><par n="Rødehavet__np"/></e>
    <e lm="sjølveige"><i>sjølveig</i><par n="øs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="okle"><i>okl</i><par n="øs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slumsøster"><i>slumsøst</i><par n="rettsøst/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skuvelære"><i>skuvelær</i><par n="øs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="piké"><i>pik</i><par n="pat/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rettsøster"><i>rettsøst</i><par n="rettsøst/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skruvmutter"><i>skruvmut</i><par n="skrumut/ter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slumsyster"><i>slumsyst</i><par n="rettsøst/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Odelstinget"><i>Odelstinget</i><par n="Rødehavet__np"/></e>
    <e lm="skyvelære"><i>skyvelær</i><par n="øs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sanitetssøster"><i>sanitetssøst</i><par n="rettsøst/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="potetpuré"><i>potetpur</i><par n="pat/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nyre"><i>nyr</i><par n="øs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="smie"><i>smi</i><par n="øs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rokokkomøbel"><i>rokokkomøb</i><par n="rokokkomøb/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Romerriket"><i>Romerriket</i><par n="Rødehavet__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Rosshavet"><i>Rosshavet</i><par n="Rødehavet__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Seljordvatnet"><i>Seljordvatnet</i><par n="Rødehavet__np"/></e>
    <e lm="sereige"><i>sereig</i><par n="øs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ordenssøster"><i>ordenssøst</i><par n="rettsøst/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="redaksjonskomité"><i>redaksjonskomit</i><par n="pat/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Osebergskipet"><i>Osebergskipet</i><par n="Rødehavet__np"/></e>
    <e lm="oppkomme"><i>oppkomm</i><par n="øs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sjukesøster"><i>sjukesøst</i><par n="rettsøst/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Ridderrennet"><i>Ridderrennet</i><par n="Rødehavet__np"/></e>
    <e lm="skrå"><i>skr</i><par n="skr/å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="øse"><i>øs</i><par n="øs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="røykjekupé"><i>røykjekup</i><par n="pat/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="portemoné"><i>portemon</i><par n="pat/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skøyte"><i>skøyt</i><par n="øs/e__n"/></e>
